nb: Dekorativ tape-app: Kortlaging; Gaveinnpakking; Hjemmeinnredning; Dagbøker og planleggere; Hobby for barn; Merking og organisering; Mixed media; Festdekorasjon; Scrapbooking; Søm og stoffmerking; Annet
cs: Aplikace dekorativní pásky: Výroba přání; Balení dárků; Bytové dekorace; Deníky a plánovače; Dětské tvoření; Štítkování a organizace; Smíšená média; Párty dekorace; Scrapbooking; Šití a značení látek; Jiné
it: Applicazione per nastro decorativo: Creazione di biglietti; Confezionamento regali; Decorazioni per la casa; Journaling e agende; Lavoretti per bambini; Etichettatura e organizzazione; Tecniche miste; Decorazioni per feste; Scrapbooking; Cucito e marcatura tessuti; Altra
pl: Zastosowanie taśmy dekoracyjnej: Tworzenie kartek; Pakowanie prezentów; Dekoracja wnętrz; Dzienniki i planery; Rękodzieło dla dzieci; Etykietowanie i organizacja; Techniki mieszane; Dekoracje imprezowe; Scrapbooking; Szycie i znakowanie tkanin; Inne
el: Εφαρμογή διακοσμητικής ταινίας: Κατασκευή καρτών; Περιτύλιγμα δώρων; Διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Ημερολόγια και ατζέντες; Παιδικές χειροτεχνίες; Ετικέτες και οργάνωση; Μικτά μέσα; Διακόσμηση πάρτι; Scrapbooking; Ράψιμο και σημάδεμα υφασμάτων; Άλλο
hu: Dekoratív szalag alkalmazása: Kártyakészítés; Ajándékcsomagolás; Lakberendezés; Naplózás és tervezők; Kézműveskedés gyerekeknek; Címkézés és rendszerezés; Kevert technika; Partidekoráció; Scrapbooking; Varrás és anyagjelölés; Egyéb
ru: Назначение декоративной ленты: Кармейкинг; Упаковка подарков; Декор для дома; Оформление дневников и планеров; Детские поделки; Маркировка и организация; Смешанные техники; Праздничный декор; Скрапбукинг; Шитье и разметка ткани; Другое
lt-LT: Dekoratyvinės juostos paskirtis: Atvirukų gamyba; Dovanų pakavimas; Namų dekoras; Žurnalai ir planuokliai; Vaikų rankdarbiai; Ženklinimas ir organizavimas; Mišri technika; Vakarėlių dekoras; Skrebinimas; Siuvimas ir audinių ženklinimas; Kita
th: เทปตกแต่งการใช้งาน: การทำการ์ด; การห่อของขวัญ; ตกแต่งบ้าน; สมุดบันทึกและแพลนเนอร์; งานฝีมือเด็ก; การติดป้ายและการจัดระเบียบ; สื่อผสม; ตกแต่งงานปาร์ตี้; การทำสมุดภาพ; การเย็บและการทำเครื่องหมายบนผ้า; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Nanesenie dekoratívnej pásky: Výroba pohľadníc; Balenie darčekov; Bytové dekorácie; Denníky a plánovače; Detské ručné práce; Označovanie a organizácia; Zmiešané médiá; Párty dekorácie; Scrapbooking; Šitie a označovanie látok; Iné
tr: Dekoratif bant uygulaması: Kart yapımı; Hediye paketi; Ev dekorasyonu; Günlükler ve ajandalar; Çocuk el sanatları; Etiketleme ve düzenleme; Karma teknik; Parti dekorasyonu; Kayıt defteri hazırlama; Dikiş ve kumaş işaretleme; Diğer
vi: Ứng dụng của băng dính trang trí: Làm thiệp; Gói quà; Trang trí nhà cửa; Viết nhật ký và lập kế hoạch; Thủ công cho trẻ em; Dán nhãn và sắp xếp; Đa chất liệu; Trang trí tiệc; Làm sổ lưu niệm; May vá và đánh dấu vải; Khác
en: Decorative tape application: Card making; Gift wrapping; Home decor; Journaling and planners; Kids crafts; Labeling and organization; Mixed media; Party decor; Scrapbooking; Sewing and fabric marking; Other
zh-TW: 裝飾膠帶用途: 卡片製作; 禮物包裝; 居家裝飾; 手帳與規劃本; 兒童手作; 標籤與收納; 複合媒材; 派對裝飾; 剪貼簿; 縫紉與布料標記; 其他
ro-RO: Aplicare bandă decorativă: Confecționare felicitări; Ambalare cadouri; Decorațiuni interioare; Jurnale și agende; Artizanat pentru copii; Etichetare și organizare; Tehnici mixte; Decorațiuni pentru petreceri; Scrapbooking; Cusut și marcare pe material; Altele
es: Aplicación de cinta decorativa: Elaboración de tarjetas; Envoltura de regalos; Decoración del hogar; Diarios y agendas; Manualidades para niños; Etiquetado y organización; Técnica mixta; Decoración de fiestas; Álbumes de recortes; Costura y marcado de telas; Otro
nl: Decoratieve tape toepassing: Kaarten maken; Cadeaus inpakken; Woondecoratie; Dagboeken en planners; Knutselen voor kinderen; Labelen en ordenen; Gemengde technieken; Feestdecoratie; Scrapbooking; Naaien en stof markeren; Overige
sv: App för dekortejp: Korttillverkning; Presentinslagning; Heminredning; Dagböcker och kalendrar; Barnpyssel; Märkning och organisering; Blandteknik; Festdekoration; Scrapbooking; Sömnad och tygmarkering; Övrigt
fr: Application du ruban décoratif: Création de cartes; Emballage de cadeaux; Décoration d’intérieur; Journaux et agendas; Bricolages pour enfants; Étiquetage et organisation; Techniques mixtes; Décoration de fête; Scrapbooking; Couture et marquage de tissus; Autre
da: Anvendelse af dekorativt tape: Kortfremstilling; Gaveindpakning; Boligindretning; Dagbøger og planlægningskalendere; Hobby til børn; Mærkning og organisering; Blandede medier; Festpynt; Scrapbog; Syning og opmærkning af stof; Andet
bg-BG: Приложение на декоративната лента: Изработка на картички; Опаковане на подаръци; Декор за дома; Журналинг и планери; Творчески занимания за деца; Етикетиране и организация; Смесени техники (mixed media); Парти декор; Скрапбукинг; Шиене и маркиране на тъкани; Друго
hr-HR: Aplikacija dekorativne trake: Izrada čestitki; Umatanje poklona; Uređenje doma; Vođenje dnevnika i planeri; Dječje rukotvorine; Označavanje i organizacija; Kombinirane tehnike; Dekoracije za zabave; Scrapbooking (izrada spomenara); Šivanje i označavanje tkanina; Ostalo
pt-PT: aplicação de fita decorativa: Fazer cartões; Embrulhos de presentes; Decoração de casa; Escrita em diários e agendas; Artesanato para crianças; Rotulagem e organização; Técnica mista; Decoração de festas; Scrapbooking; Costura e marcação de tecidos; Outro
sl-SI: Nanos okrasnega traku: Izdelava voščilnic; Zavijanje daril; Dekoracija doma; Vodenje dnevnikov in planerjev; Otroško ustvarjanje; Označevanje in organizacija; Mešani mediji; Dekoracija za zabave; Izdelava spominskih knjig; Šivanje in označevanje blaga; Drugo
zh-CN: 装饰胶带应用方式: 贺卡制作; 礼品包装; 家居装饰; 手账和计划本; 儿童手工艺品; 标签与分类; 混合媒材; 派对装饰; 剪贴簿制作; 缝纫和织物标记; 其他
ja: デコレーションテープ適用: カード作成; ギフトラッピング; ホームデコ; ジャーナル・手帳; キッズクラフト; ラベル付け・整理; ミクストメディア; パーティーデコレーション; スクラップブッキング; 裁縫・布のマーキング; その他
ko: 장식용 테이프 용도: 카드 만들기; 선물 포장; 홈 데코; 저널링 및 플래너; 어린이 공예; 라벨링 및 정리; 믹스드 미디어; 파티 데코; 스크랩북; 바느질 및 원단 표시; 기타
fi: Koristeteipin käyttösovellus: Korttiaskartelu; Lahjapaketointi; Sisustus; Päiväkirjat ja kalenterit; Lasten askartelu; Nimikointi ja järjestely; Sekatekniikka; Juhlakoristelu; Skräppäys; Ompelu ja kankaan merkintä; Muu
pt-BR: Aplicação de fita decorativa: Confecção de cartões; Embalagem de presentes; Decoração de casa; Diários e planners; Artesanato infantil; Rotulagem e organização; Técnica mista; Decoração de festas; Scrapbook; Costura e marcação de tecido; Outra
de: Verwendungsart des Dekorbands: Kartengestaltung; Geschenkverpackung; Wohndeko; Journaling und Planer; Basteln für Kinder; Beschriftung und Organisation; Mixed-Media; Party-Deko; Scrapbooking; Nähen und Stoffmarkierung; Sonstige